Alaska statutes. Title 27. Mining.
Article 2. Surface Coal Mining.
Sec. 27.21.230.
Inspections and monitoring.

The commissioner shall provide for an inspection of a surface coal mining and reclamation operation to evaluate compliance with this chapter, and, for that purpose, an authorized representative of the commissioner may enter the surface coal mining and reclamation operation. The commissioner shall, to the extent possible, coordinate the inspection and monitoring activities with other agencies having responsibilities with regard to the operation.

In administering and enforcing this chapter or determining whether a person is in violation of this chapter

the commissioner may require a permittee to

establish appropriate records and maintain them in the state;

make monthly reports to the commissioner;

install, use, and maintain necessary monitoring equipment or methods;

evaluate results in accordance with the methods, at the locations and intervals, and in the manner the commissioner prescribes; and

provide other information relating to the permittee’s operations as the commissioner considers reasonable and necessary;

for a surface coal mining and reclamation operation that removes or disturbs strata that serve as aquifers that significantly ensure the hydrologic balance of water use either on or off the site of the operation, the commissioner may specify

monitoring sites for the use of equipment and methods under (1)(C) of this subsection to record

the quantity and quality of surface drainage above and below the site of the operation as well as in the area potentially affected by the operation;

level, amount, and samples of ground water and aquifers that are potentially affected by the operation, and ground water and aquifers that are directly below the deepest coal seam to be mined under the operation; and

precipitation at the site of the operation; and

the records of well logs and borehole information that a permittee must maintain;

the authorized representatives of the commissioner, without advance notice and upon presentation of appropriate credentials, may enter an operation or premises in which records required to be maintained under this section are located and may at reasonable times, and without delay, have access to and copy the records and inspect monitoring equipment or an operating method required under this chapter.

Inspection by the commissioner under (b)(3) of this section shall

occur on an irregular basis averaging not less than one partial inspection per month and one complete inspection per calendar quarter; and

occur without prior notice to the permittee or the permittee’s agents, except as provided in (e) of this section.

After conducting an inspection under (b)(3) of this section, an inspector shall file with the commissioner, and the commissioner shall maintain, an inspection report adequate to assist the commissioner in enforcing the requirements of this chapter and carrying out the terms and purposes of this chapter.

A representative of the permittee who is at the site of the operation at the time an inspection under (b)(3) of this section begins may accompany the inspector during the inspection. The inspector shall notify the representative of the permittee of the permittee’s right under this subsection before beginning the inspection.

A permittee shall conspicuously maintain at the entrances to the operation a clearly visible sign that states the name, business address, and phone number of the permittee and the permit number of the operation.

An inspector, upon detection of a violation of this chapter, shall immediately report the violation to the operator and to the commissioner in writing.

A person who is or may be adversely affected by a surface coal mining operation may notify the commissioner, in writing, of a violation of this chapter that the person has reason to believe exists at the site of the surface coal mining operation. The commissioner shall, by regulation, establish procedures for review of a refusal by a representative of the commissioner to issue a notice of violation or cessation order with respect to the alleged violation. The commissioner shall furnish a person requesting the review with a written statement of the commissioner’s findings and reasons for the findings.

The commissioner shall, by regulation, establish procedures to ensure that adequate and complete inspections are made under this section. Any person who is or may be adversely affected by a surface coal mining operation may notify the commissioner of a failure to make an adequate or complete inspection under this section. If the commissioner receives notification from a person under this subsection, the commissioner shall investigate the inspection and shall furnish the person with a written determination and the reasons for the determination.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.230. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.240.
Enforcement.

If, on the basis of an inspection under AS

27.21.230

, the commissioner determines that a person or a person’s operation is in violation of this chapter or a term of a permit and that the violation creates an imminent danger to the health or safety of the public or is causing or can reasonably be expected to cause significant, imminent, environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, the commissioner shall immediately issue a notice of violation and order a cessation of the person’s surface coal mining operation or the portion of the operation relating to the violation. The cessation order remains in effect until the commissioner determines that the violation has been abated, or until modified, vacated, or terminated under (d) or (h) of this section. If the commissioner finds that the ordered cessation of the operation, or a portion of the operation, will not completely abate the imminent danger to the health or safety of the public or the significant, imminent, environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, the commissioner shall, in addition to the cessation order, impose affirmative obligations on the operator to take the steps the commissioner considers necessary to abate the imminent danger or significant environmental harm.

If, on the basis of an inspection, the commissioner determines that a person or a person’s operation is in violation of this chapter or a term of a permit and that the violation does not create an imminent danger to the health or safety of the public and is not causing and cannot reasonably be expected to cause significant, imminent, environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, the commissioner shall issue a notice of violation to the permittee setting a reasonable time, which may not exceed 90 days from the date the notice is issued, for the abatement of the violation. However, the commissioner may, for good cause, extend the time for the abatement of the violation. If, at the end of the time allowed for abatement of the violation, the commissioner finds, in writing, that the violation has not been abated, the commissioner shall order a cessation of the person’s surface coal mining operation or the portion of the operation relating to the violation. The cessation order remains in effect until the commissioner determines that the violation has been abated or until it is modified, vacated, or terminated under (d) or (h) of this section. The commissioner shall determine the steps necessary to abate the violation in the most expeditious manner possible and shall include the necessary measures in the cessation order issued under this section.

A person who is or may be adversely affected by a notice of violation or cessation order issued under (a) or (b) of this section, or by a modification, vacation, or termination of the notice or order, may apply to the commissioner for review of the notice or order within 60 days after receipt of the notice or order by the operator or permittee or within 60 days after the modification, vacation, or termination of the notice or order. On receipt of the application, the commissioner shall provide for an investigation and an investigation report, as the commissioner considers appropriate. At the request of the applicant or another person who is or may be adversely affected, the commissioner shall provide for a public hearing to enable the applicant to present information relating to the notice or order or the modification, vacation, or termination of the notice or order. The filing of an application for review under this subsection may not operate as a stay of the order or notice. The commissioner shall give the applicant and other interested persons written notice of the time and place of the hearing at least five days before the hearing. AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to a hearing under this subsection except as provided by regulations adopted under this chapter.

After any review under (c) of this section, the commissioner shall issue a written decision that includes findings of fact and an order vacating, affirming, modifying, or terminating the notice or order. If the application for review under (c) of this section relates to a cessation order issued under (a) or (b) of this section, the commissioner shall issue the written decision within 30 days after receipt of the application for review unless the commissioner grants a request for temporary relief under (e) of this section.

An applicant for review under (c) of this section may file with the commissioner a written request for temporary relief from a notice or order issued under (a) or (b) of this section before completion of the review of the notice or order. The written request must include a detailed statement of the reasons in support of the request. The commissioner shall expeditiously issue an order granting or denying the temporary relief. If the applicant requests temporary relief from a cessation order issued under (a) or (b) of this section, the commissioner shall issue an order granting or denying the temporary relief within 10 days after the commissioner receives the written request. The commissioner may grant the temporary relief under this subsection only

after the commissioner holds a hearing in the locality of the permit area on the request for temporary relief in which the parties have an opportunity to be heard;

if the applicant shows that there is substantial likelihood that the findings of the commissioner under (d) of this section will be favorable to the applicant; and

if the temporary relief will not adversely affect the health or safety of the public or cause significant, imminent, environmental harm to land, air, or water resources.

If, on the basis of an inspection, the commissioner has reason to believe that a pattern of violations of this chapter or of a term of a permit exists or has existed, and if the commissioner finds that the violations are caused by the unwarranted failure of the permittee to comply with the requirements or that the violations were wilfully caused by the permittee, the commissioner shall issue a notice of violation and an order to the permittee to, within a specified time period, show cause why the permit should not be suspended or revoked. The order to show cause must include notice to the permittee that a hearing may be requested within 30 days.

If the permittee requests a hearing under (f) of this section, the commissioner shall inform the permittee and other known interested persons of the time, place, and date of the hearing. AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to a hearing under this subsection except as provided by regulations adopted under this chapter. Within 60 days following the hearing or following the order to show cause if no hearing is requested, the commissioner shall issue and furnish to the permittee and all other parties to the hearing a written decision, order, and the reasons for both, concerning the suspension or revocation of the permit. If the commissioner suspends or revokes the permit, the permittee shall immediately cease the surface coal mining operation on the permit area and shall complete the reclamation of the permit area within the time specified by the commissioner. If the permittee fails to complete the reclamation, the commissioner shall declare the performance bonds for the operation forfeited.

A notice or order issued under this section shall state with reasonable specificity the nature of the violation, the abatement required, the period of time established for abatement, and a reasonable description of the portion of the operation to which the notice or order applies. Each notice or order issued under this section must be given promptly to the alleged violator at the mine site unless the alleged violator has appointed an agent, in which case the agent may be served. A notice or order issued under this section may be modified, vacated, or terminated by the commissioner. A cessation order issued under (a) or (b) of this section expires not more than 30 days after the alleged violator receives actual notice of the order unless an informal conference is held as provided in regulations adopted under this chapter or unless the right to such a conference is waived by the alleged violator. The commissioner shall hold the conference at a location that allows the permit area to be viewed during the conference. The commissioner shall issue a written order affirming, modifying, vacating, or terminating the cessation order within five days of the conference. The holding of a conference or the waiver of it does not prejudice any other rights to administrative or judicial review provided under this chapter nor does it operate as a stay of a notice or order.

Whenever an order is issued under this chapter, the commissioner may, in the commissioner’s discretion, assess any party for the costs and attorney fees reasonably incurred by another party in connection with the order.

The commissioner may request the attorney general to institute a civil action for relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other appropriate order, if a person

violates an order or notice issued by the commissioner under this chapter;

interferes with the commissioner carrying out the provisions of this chapter;

unlawfully refuses to admit the commissioner into an operation;

unlawfully refuses to permit inspection of an operation by the commissioner;

fails to furnish information or a report requested by the commissioner under regulations adopted under this chapter; or

refuses to permit access to or copying of records by the commissioner that the commissioner determines are reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

An action under (j) of this section shall be brought in the superior court in the judicial district in which the greater portion of the operation is located or in the judicial district where the operator’s principal office is located. The superior court has jurisdiction to grant appropriate relief under (j) of this section. Relief granted by a superior court for a situation described in (j)(1) of this section continues in effect until the completion of proceedings for review of the notice or order under this section unless before that time the superior court modifies or sets aside the notice or order.

In the case of a judicial proceeding to review an order or decision issued by the commissioner under this chapter, the court may, under conditions it may prescribe, grant the temporary relief it considers appropriate pending final determination of the proceedings if

all parties to the proceedings have been notified and given an opportunity to be heard on a request for temporary relief;

the person requesting the relief shows that there is a substantial likelihood that the person will prevail on the merits of the final determination of the proceeding; and

the relief will not adversely affect the public health or safety or cause significant imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources.

The commencement of a judicial proceeding to review an order or decision of the commissioner does not, unless specifically ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the action, order, or decision of the commissioner.

The fact that action of the commissioner is subject to judicial review in accordance with other provisions of state law may not be construed to limit the operation of the rights established in AS

27.21.950

except as provided in that section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.240. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.250.
Penalties.

The commissioner may assess a civil penalty against a person if the person or the person’s operation violates a condition of a permit or a provision of this chapter. If as a result of the violation the commissioner issues a cessation order under AS

27.21.240

, the commissioner shall assess a civil penalty. The civil penalty may not exceed $5,000 for a violation. The commissioner may consider each day of a continuing violation as a separate violation for the purposes of this subsection. In determining whether to assess and the amount of a civil penalty, the commissioner shall consider the person’s history of previous violations at the site of the operation, the seriousness of the violation, including the irreparable harm done to the environment and the hazard created to the health or safety of the public, the person’s negligence, and the good faith of the person in attempting to achieve rapid compliance after receiving notification of the violation.

Within 30 days after issuing a notice or order under AS

27.21.240

to a person, the commissioner shall inform the person of the amount of the penalty. The person notified of the penalty then has 30 days in which to pay the penalty in full or to contest either the amount of the penalty or the fact of the violation. If the person wishes to contest either the amount of the penalty or the fact of the violation, the person may submit to the commissioner a bond equal to the penalty amount at the time the person files an application for review. The bond shall be conditioned for the satisfaction of the penalty in full if the commissioner’s determination of an occurrence of a violation and the assessment of a penalty are affirmed. An application for review is effective when the bond is approved by the commissioner. If the bond is not approved, the person charged with the penalty shall forward the proposed amount to the commissioner within 10 days of the disapproval of the bond for placement in an escrow account in order to make the petition effective.

The commissioner shall assess a civil penalty under (a) of this section only after the person charged with a violation has been given an opportunity for a public hearing. If a public hearing is held, the commissioner shall make findings of fact and shall issue a written decision relating to the occurrence of the violation and the amount of the civil penalty that is warranted. The written decision may order the person to pay the penalty. The commissioner may consolidate a hearing under this section with other proceedings under AS

27.21.240

. AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to a hearing under this subsection except as provided by regulations adopted under this chapter. If the person notified of a penalty does not request a public hearing, the commissioner may assess the penalty and order its payment only after the commissioner has determined that the person committed the violation and has determined the amount of the penalty that is warranted.

A civil penalty owed under this section may be recovered in a civil action brought by the attorney general at the request of the commissioner.

A person other than a corporation who wilfully and knowingly violates a condition of a permit, an order issued under AS

27.21.240

, or an order incorporated in a final decision under this chapter, except an order incorporated in a decision issued under (c) of this section, is guilty of a class C felony.

If a corporation violates a condition of a permit, an order issued under AS

27.21.240

, or an order incorporated in a final decision issued by the commissioner under this chapter, except an order incorporated in a decision issued under (c) of this section, a director, officer, or agent of the corporation who wilfully and knowingly authorized, ordered, or carried out the violation is subject to a civil penalty under (a) — (d) of this section and is guilty of a class C felony.

A person who knowingly makes a false statement, representation, or certification, or knowingly fails to make a required statement, representation, or certification in an application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained under this chapter is guilty of a class C felony.

A person who fails to correct a violation for which a notice of violation or a cessation order has been issued under AS

27.21.240

within the period or subsequent extension permitted for its correction shall be assessed a civil penalty of $750 for each day the failure or violation continues. The period for correction continues until

the entry of a final order by the commissioner in a review proceeding initiated by the alleged violator in which the commissioner orders, after an expedited hearing, the suspension of the abatement requirements of the notice or order after determining that the alleged violator will suffer irreparable loss or damage from the application of those requirements; or

the entry of an order of the court in a review proceeding under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) initiated by the alleged violator in which the court orders the suspension of the abatement requirements of the notice or order.

A person who, except as permitted by law, wilfully resists, prevents, impedes, or interferes with the commissioner in the performance of duties under this chapter is guilty of a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.250. Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For fines and sentences for felonies, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.125

.

Sec. 27.21.260.
Areas unsuitable for surface coal mining.

The commissioner shall use competent and scientifically sound data and information in order to make objective decisions as to which areas of land are unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal operations. The decisions shall

reflect the planning activities of federal, state, and municipal governments; and

use a data base and inventory system that will permit the evaluation of areas of the state to support and permit reclamation of surface coal mining operations.

A person or municipality having an interest that is or may be adversely affected may file a petition with the commissioner to designate an area as unsuitable for mining or to terminate a designation under this section. The petition must contain allegations of facts with supporting evidence that would tend to establish the allegations. Within three to seven months after receipt of a petition, the commissioner shall hold a public hearing in the locality of the area, under regulations adopted by the commissioner. The commissioner may extend the time within which a hearing must be held if an extension is required to include a field season. After the filing of a petition and before the hearing, other persons may intervene by filing allegations of fact with supporting evidence. Within 60 days after the hearing, the commissioner shall issue and furnish to the petitioner and intervenors a written decision regarding the petition and the reasons for the commissioner’s decision. The commissioner may cancel the hearing if the parties all agree to the cancellation.

Upon receipt of a petition under (b) of this section, the commissioner

shall designate an area as unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining operations if the commissioner determines that reclamation in accordance with this chapter and regulations adopted under it is not technologically feasible in the area;

may designate an area as unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining operations if the commissioner determines that the operations in the area will

be incompatible with existing state or local land use programs;

affect fragile or historic land in which the operations could result in significant damage to important historic, cultural, scientific, and aesthetic values and natural systems;

affect aquifer recharge areas or other renewable resource land in which the operations could result in a substantial loss or reduction of long-range productivity of water supply or food or fiber products; or

affect areas subject to frequent flooding and areas of unstable geology, or other natural hazard land in which the operations could substantially endanger life and property.

Subject to valid existing rights, the commissioner may not permit surface coal mining operations except those that existed on August 3, 1977,

on any land within the boundaries of a unit of the National Park System, the National Wildlife Refuge Systems, the National System of Trails, the National Wilderness Preservation System, the Wild and Scenic Rivers System, including study rivers designated under section 5(a) of the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act, and National Recreation Areas designated by Act of Congress;

that will adversely affect a publicly owned park or a place included in the National Register of Historic Sites unless approved jointly by the commissioner and the federal, state, or local agency that has jurisdiction over the park or the historic site;

within 100 feet of the outside right-of-way line of any public road, except where mine access roads or haulage roads join the right-of-way line, and except that the commissioner may permit roads to be relocated or the area affected to lie within 100 feet of a road, if after public notice and opportunity for public hearing in the locality, a written finding is made that the interests of the public and the landowners affected by it will be protected; or

within 300 feet from any occupied dwelling, unless waived by the owner of the dwelling, or within 300 feet of a public building, school, church, community, institutional building, or public park, or within 100 feet of a cemetery.

Before designating an area as unsuitable under this section, the commissioner shall prepare a detailed statement of the potential coal resources of the area, the demand for coal resources, and the impact of the designation on the environment, the economy, and the supply of coal.

Determinations of unsuitability of land for surface coal mining must consider present and future land use planning and regulation processes at the federal, state, and local levels.

This section does not apply to land on which a surface coal mining operation was conducted on or before August 3, 1977, or under a permit issued under this chapter before a determination of unsuitability. This section does not apply to an area if a person had made substantial legal or financial commitments for an operation or proposed operation in that area before January 4, 1977.

A designation of unsuitability under this section does not prevent coal exploration of any designated area.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations to implement this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.260. Renumbered in 1983.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5(a) of the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act, referred to in subsection (d)(1), may be found in 16 U.S.C. § 1276.